Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1903HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1026 Section 1. Section 422.12A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the 3 credits allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by an 4 adoption tax credit equal to the amount of qualified adoption 5 expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with 6 the adoption of a child by the taxpayer, not to exceed five 7 twenty thousand dollars per adoption. 8 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 11 retroactively to January 1, 2024, for tax years beginning on or 12 after that date if the adoption becomes final on or after that 13 date. 14